src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON BASUDISUCASE ! Bisyll. Non-Gradating C-Proper Names
 +Sg+Nom:        K     ;
 +Sg+Nom:        RHyph ;
    +Ess:an      K     ;
 +Sg+Ill:aj      K     ;
 +Sg+Gen:aQ1     K     ;
 +Sg+Gen:aQ1     RHyph ;
 +Sg+Acc:aQ1v    K     ;
 +Sg+Ine:aQ1n    K     ;
 +Sg+Ela:aQ1s    K     ;
 +Pl+Nom:aQ1     K     ;
 +Pl+Gen:aQ1j    K     ;
 +Pl+Gen:aQ1j    RHyph ;
 +Pl+Acc:aQ1jt   K     ;
 +Pl+Ill:aQ1jda  K     ;
 +Pl+Ine:aQ1jn   K     ;
 +Pl+Ela:aQ1js   K     ;
 +Pl+Com:aQ1j    K     ;
 +Sg+Com:aQ1X5jn K     ;

LEXICON BASUDISUCASE-ORG ! Bisyll. Non-Gradating C-Proper Names
 +Sg+Nom:        K     ;
 +Sg+Nom:        RHyph ;
    +Ess:an      K     ;
 +Sg+Ill:aj      K     ;
 +Sg+Gen:aQ1     K     ;
 +Sg+Gen:aQ1     RHyph ;
 +Sg+Acc:aQ1v    K     ;
 +Sg+Ine:aQ1n    K     ;
 +Sg+Ela:aQ1s    K     ;
! +Pl+Nom:aQ1 K ;
! +Pl+Gen:aQ1j K ;
! +Pl+Gen:aQ1j RHyph ;
! +Pl+Acc:aQ1jt K ;
! +Pl+Ill:aQ1jda K ;
! +Pl+Ine:aQ1jn K ;
! +Pl+Ela:aQ1js K ;
! +Pl+Com:aQ1j K ;
 +Sg+Com:aQ1X5jn K     ;


!! Words in lexicon NYSTØ end on vowel, no cg, case suffixes added directly, but with ill -aj, ela -as. Last syllable is stressed, and therefore they work like standard C-final 4-syllabic stems (like gånågis, etc). Get an even syllable case marking. Non-assimilated stems.

LEXICON NYSTØ-ani !!= @CODE@ Animal names. Presently not used in SMJ.
 +N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%> NYSTØDECL ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-fem !!= @CODE@ Femal names
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>                NYSTØDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #         ;

!!€gt-norm: Britney # Even-syllable test
!!€ Britney:                Britney+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom
!!€ Britneyav:              Britney+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Acc
!!€ Britneyaj:              Britney+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill
!!€ Britneyas:              Britney+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela

LEXICON NYSTØ-femsur !!= @CODE@ Names that can be both female and surnames. Presently not used in SMJ.
   NYSTØ-fem ;
   NYSTØ-sur ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-mal !!= @CODE@ Male name
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>                NYSTØDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #         ;

!!€gt-norm: Taneli # Even-syllable test
!!€ Taneli:                Taneli+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom
!!€ Taneliav:              Taneli+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc
!!€ Taneliaj:              Taneli+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill
!!€ Tanelias:              Taneli+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela

LEXICON NYSTØ-obj !!= @CODE@ Objects
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> NYSTØDECL ;

!!€gt-norm: Infiniti # Even-syllable test
!!€ Infiniti:                 Infiniti+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom
!!€ Infinitiav:               Infiniti+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Acc
!!€ Infinitiaj:               Infiniti+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill
!!€ Infinitias:               Infiniti+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela

LEXICON NYSTØ-org !!= @CODE@  Organizations
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> NYSTØDECL-ORG ;

!!€gt-norm: Kulturby # Even-syllable test
!!€ Kulturby:                Kulturby+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom
!!€ Kulturbyav:              Kulturby+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Acc
!!€ Kulturbyaj:              Kulturby+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill
!!€ Kulturbyas:              Kulturby+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela

!!€gt-norm: Nestlé # Even-syllable test
!!€ Nestlé:                Nestlé+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom
!!€ Nestléav:              Nestlé+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Acc
!!€ Nestléaj:              Nestlé+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill
!!€ Nestléas:              Nestlé+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela

!!€gt-norm: Reinslakteri # Even-syllable test
!!€ Reinslakteri:                Reinslakteri+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom
!!€ Reinslakteriav:              Reinslakteri+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Acc
!!€ Reinslakteriaj:              Reinslakteri+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill
!!€ Reinslakterias:              Reinslakteri+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela

LEXICON NYSTØ-LOAN-org !!= @CODE@ Organizations loan
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> NYSTØDECL-LOAN ;

!!€gt-norm: Sameby # Even-syllable test
!!€ Sameby:                Sameby+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom
!!$ Samebyaj:              Sameby+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill
!!$ Samebyas:              Sameby+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela

LEXICON NYSTØ-sur !!= @CODE@ Sur names
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>                NYSTØDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #         ;

!!€gt-norm: Sandoz # Even-syllable test
!!€ Sandoz:                Sandoz+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom
!!€ Sandozav:                Sandoz+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Acc
!!€ Sandozaj:              Sandoz+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill
!!€ Sandozas:              Sandoz+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela

LEXICON NYSTØ-surplc !!= @CODE@  Names that can be both sur- and placenames.
   NYSTØ-sur ;
   NYSTØ-plc ;

!!€gt-norm: Teigmo # Even-syllable test
!!€ Teigmo:                Teigmo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom
!!€ Teigmoav:              Teigmo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc
!!€ Teigmoaj:              Teigmo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill
!!€ Teigmoas:              Teigmo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela

LEXICON NYSTØ-LOAN-plc !!= @CODE@ Place names loan
                           +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>                NYSTØDECL-LOAN ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen@U.Cap.Opt@+Err/Orth:%>a000@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK         ;

!!€gt-norm: Bodø # Even-syllable test
!!€ Bodø:                Bodø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom
!!$ Bodøaj:              Bodø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill
!!$ Bodøas:              Bodø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela

LEXICON NYSTØ-plc !!= @CODE@ Place names
                   +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>                NYSTØDECL-PLC ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen@U.Cap.Opt@:%>a000@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK        ;

!!€gt-norm: Borgå # Even-syllable test
!!€ Borgå:                Borgå+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom
!!€ Borgåav:              Borgå+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc
!!€ Borgåaj:              Borgå+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill
!!€ Borgåas:              Borgå+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela

!LEXICON NYSTØ !!= @CODE@  Vowel-final, heavy syll
! +N+Prop:%> NYSTØDECL ;

LEXICON NYSTØDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ NYSTØ-OBL ;

LEXICON NYSTØDECL-PLC
 @U.Cap.Obl@ NYSTØ-OBL ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ      ; ! XXX Sub?

LEXICON NYSTØDECL-ORG
 @U.Cap.Obl@ NYSTØ-OBL-ORG ;

LEXICON NYSTØDECL-LOAN
 @U.Cap.Obl@ NYSTØ-OBL-LOAN ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ           ; ! XXX Sub?


LEXICON NYSTØ-OBL
          +Sg+Nom:   K     ;
          +Sg+Nom:   RHyph ;
! +Sg+Ela:%:s K ; ! Nystø:s  !SUB
! +Sg+Ine:%:n K ; ! Nystø:s  !SUB
 +Sg+Gen#+Err/Orth:a# RHyph ; ! !for placenames
         +Sg+Gen#:#  RHyph ; ! for placenames
                     NYOBL ;
         +Err/Orth:%: NYOBL ; ! ! to NYOBL, optional delimiter marks. sub?
         +Err/Orth:%- NYOBL ;
         +Err/Orth:1  NYOBL ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-OBL-ORG
          +Sg+Nom:   K         ;
          +Sg+Nom:   RHyph     ;
! +Sg+Ela:%:s K ; ! Nystø:s  !SUB
! +Sg+Ine:%:n K ; ! Nystø:s  !SUB
 +Sg+Gen#+Err/Orth:a# RHyph     ; ! !for placenames
         +Sg+Gen#:#  RHyph     ; ! for placenames
                     NYOBL-ORG ;
         +Err/Orth:%: NYOBL-ORG ; ! ! to NYOBL, optional delimiter marks. sub?
         +Err/Orth:%- NYOBL-ORG ;
         +Err/Orth:1  NYOBL-ORG ;


LEXICON NYSTØ-OBL-LOAN
          +Sg+Nom:   K         ;
          +Sg+Nom:   RHyph     ;
! +Sg+Ela:%:s K ; ! Nystø:s  !SUB
! +Sg+Ine:%:n K ; ! Nystø:s  !SUB
 +Sg+Gen#+Err/Orth:a# RHyph     ; ! !for placenames
 +Sg+Gen#+Err/Orth:#  RHyph     ; ! ! for placenames
         +Err/Orth:   NYOBL-ORG ;
         +Err/Orth:%: NYOBL-ORG ; ! ! to NYOBL, optional delimiter marks. sub?
         +Err/Orth:%- NYOBL-ORG ;
         +Err/Orth:1  NYOBL-ORG ;


!LEXICON NYSTØ-DC
! +laš:lažž DEARVVASLAS ;
