src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ProperNoun
Aabo:Aa^bo9 NYSTØ-sur ;
Aalmo:Aal^mo9 NYSTØ-sur ;
Belbo:Bel^bo9 NYSTØ-sur ;
Bjørsmo:Bjørs^mo9 NYSTØ-sur ;
Bo+CmpN/None:Bo9 NYSTØ-plc ; !
DiCaprio:DiCaprio9 NYSTØ-sur ;
Einmo:Ein^mo9 NYSTØ-sur ;
Esbo:Es^bo9 NYSTØ-plc ;
Formo:For^mo9 NYSTØ-sur ;
Grensemo+Use/Sub:Grense^mo9 NYSTØ-sur ; !
Grimsmo:Grims^mo9 NYSTØ-sur ;
Grønmo:Grøn^mo9 NYSTØ-plc ;
Hambro:Ham^bro9 NYSTØ-plc ;
Hellemo:Hellemo9 NYSTØ-plc ;
Høylo:Høy^lo9 NYSTØ-sur ;
Kalvemo:Kalve^mo9 NYSTØ-sur ;
Kosmo:Kos^mo9 NYSTØ-sur ;
Krokmo:Krok^mo9 NYSTØ-sur ;
Kvermo:Kver^mo9 NYSTØ-sur ;
Lyftingsmo:Lyftings^mo9 NYSTØ-plc ;
Mo+CmpN/None:Mo9 NYSTØ-plc ; !
Modoroo:Modoroo9 NYSTØ-mal ;
Ngo:Ngo9 NYSTØ-plc ;
Ockelbo:Ockel^bo9 NYSTØ-plc ;
Poulsbo+Use/Sub:Pouls^bo9 NYSTØ-plc ; !
Prestbakmo:Prest^bak^mo9 NYSTØ-plc ;
Qingdao:Qingdao9 NYSTØ-plc ;
Riderbo:Riderbo9 NYSTØ-sur ;
Sagelvmo:Sag^elvmo9 NYSTØ-sur ;
Ski-Doo:Ski-Doo9 NYSTØ-ani ;
Skidoo:Skidoo9 NYSTØ-obj ;
Teigmo:Teig^mo9 NYSTØ-surplc ;
Vibo:Vi^bo9 NYSTØ-plc ;
Viterbo:Viter^bo9 NYSTØ-plc ;
Åbybro:Å^by^bro9 NYSTØ-plc ;
Örebro:Öre^bro9 NYSTØ-plc ;
